Wyoming, session 2025, SF0139.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 23-2-303(d) is amended to read:

23-2-303. Trapping licenses; tagging; traps and
snares; penalty; confiscation; inspection; interference
with trapping.

SF0139

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0230
(d) The commission, following consultation with other
affected entities, may promulgate rules and regulations
establishing specifications for setbacks, snares, breakaway
weights, location of breakaway devices, loop size and
anchors for trapping and snaring of furbearing and
predatory animals. All traps and snares used for furbearing
or predatory animals shall be permanently marked or tagged
with the name and address of the owner or the
identification number assigned to the owner by the
department. Any identification number attached to a trap or
snare pursuant to this subsection is solely for the use of
the department or appropriate law enforcement officers and
is not a public record for purposes of W.S. 16-4-201
through 16-4-205. No trap or snare shall be set for
furbearing or predatory animals within thirty (30) feet of
any exposed bait or carcass over five (5) pounds in weight.
As used in this subsection, "exposed bait or carcass" means
the meat or viscera of any part of a mammal, bird or fish,
excluding dried bones. All snares used for taking
furbearing or predatory animals shall be equipped with a
break-away device. Unless otherwise specified in this
subsection, all steel-jawed leghold traps shall be checked
by the owner at least once during each seventy-two (72)
SF0139

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0230
hour period unless extensions are granted by the
department. All snares and quick kill body grip traps shall
be checked by the owner not less than once each week unless
extensions are granted by the department. All wildlife
caught in any trap or snare shall upon discovery, be
removed immediately by the owner. Violation of this
subsection constitutes a low misdemeanor punishable as
provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v).

Section 2. W.S. 23-2-303(b) is repealed.

Section 3. The game and fish commission shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement the provisions
of this act.

SF0139

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0230
Section 4.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective January 1, 2026.

(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
SF0139